Massachusetts, session 194th, H4856.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21G of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 21. Registration statements and permits for withdrawals for use in a cranberry
operation may be transferred to and used for mitigation by other permitted or registered users.
SECTION 2. Not later than December 31, 2026, the department of environmental
protection shall establish such regulations, principles, policies and guidelines as are necessary to
implement section 21 of chapter 21G of the General Laws.
of 1